Maryland, session 2026, SB0960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9–109.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0960*

SENATE BILL 960
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES”
MEANS PREMISES THAT ARE:
(I) OWNED OR LEASED BY A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL; OR
(II) OCCUPIED AND UTILIZED BY A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
TO PROVIDE A PROGRAM OF PRIMARY OR SECONDARY EDUCATION TO ITS
STUDENTS.
(2) (I) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION SHALL DISTRIBUTE FUNDS TO PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS FOR THE
MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION FOR
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS TO PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES, DEBT SERVICE,
OR RENT OR LEASE PAYMENTS.
(II) FUNDS DISBURSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE PAID DIRECTLY TO THE PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL AND MAY
NOT BE PAID TO A LOCAL GOVERNING BODY OR COUNTY BOARD.
(3) IF A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL IS LOCATED IN A BUILDING OWNED
BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM, THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE FUNDS TO THE PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS TO THE SCHOOL FACILITY, DEBT SERVICE, OR RENT
OR LEASE PAYMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN FISCAL YEARS DURING WHICH
THE SCHOOL FACILITY IS UNDERGOING A PROJECT THAT IS RECEIVING STATE
FUNDING THROUGH THE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.
(4) IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM IN A FISCAL YEAR IS LESS THAN THE TOTAL AMOUNT IN THE PRIOR
FISCAL YEAR, THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS DISTRIBUTED TO PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE FISCAL YEAR SHALL BE PROPORTIONATELY
REDUCED.
(5) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION
MAY NOT USE FUNDS DISTRIBUTED TO A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION AS JUSTIFICATION TO REDUCE THE AMOUNT PROVIDED TO A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM THROUGH THE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM.
(6) A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL THAT RECEIVES FUNDS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION DURING A FISCAL YEAR SHALL REPORT TO THE INTERAGENCY
COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ON THE STATUS OF ANY PROJECT FOR
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS TO PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES, DEBT SERVICE,
OR RENT OR LEASE PAYMENTS BEFORE THE PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL MAY
RECEIVE FUNDS FOR THE FOLLOWING FISCAL YEAR.

SENATE BILL 960 3
(3) (7) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION FOR THE MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENTS TO PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES, DEBT SERVICE, OR RENT
OR LEASE PAYMENTS THAT IS EQUAL TO THE TOTAL AGGREGATE STUDENT
ENROLLMENT IN THE MARYLAND PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL PROGRAM FOR THE
PRIOR FISCAL YEAR MULTIPLIED BY $1,600 $200.
(4) (8) (I) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) IN THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION
SHALL INCLUDE REGULATIONS THAT:
1. ESTABLISH THE PROCEDURES TO COMPLY WITH
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SUBMITS A
MID–YEAR CAPITAL PROJECT FUNDING REQUEST; AND
2. ENSURE A PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL RECEIVES
FUNDS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM RESCINDS A
CAPITAL PROJECT FUNDING REQUEST AND THE PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL IS
SUBSEQUENTLY ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.